Illinois, session 104th, SB1330.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-9.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-9.1)7    Sec. 1-9.1. Ballot counting information dissemination. 8    (a) Each election authority shall maintain maintaining a 9website and shall must provide 24-hour notice on its website 10of the date, time, and location of the analysis, processing, 11and counting of all ballot forms. Each election authority 12shall must notify any political party or pollwatcher of the 13same information 24 hours before the count begins if such 14political party or pollwatcher has requested to be notified. 15Notification may be by electronic mail at the address provided 16by the requester.17    (b) Each election authority shall update the election 18results on its website each time a new batch of votes is 19tabulated or every 12 hours, whichever is less. Each election 20authority shall also update on its website, every 12 hours, 21the number of vote by mail ballots, by precinct, that have 22been: (i) requested but not received by the election 23authority; (ii) received but have not been tabulated by the   SB1330- 2 -LRB104 09899 SPS 19969 b1election authority; and (iii) rejected by the election 2authority.3(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)